DTC P1922 [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]


id0102c3839200

DTC P1922

Fuel additive level circuit malfunction

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The PCM monitors the fuel additive level using the fuel additive control module. If the fuel additive control module detects that fuel additive control module terminal 13 voltage is below or above threshold, the PCM determines that the fuel additive level sensor circuit is malfunction.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Fuel additive level sensor malfunction
•  Connector or terminal malfunction
•  Open circuit in wiring between fuel additive level sensor terminal A and fuel additive control module terminal 11
•  Short to ground in wiring between fuel additive level sensor terminal A and fuel additive control module terminal 11
•  Open circuit in wiring between fuel additive level sensor terminal B and fuel additive control module terminal 13
•  Short to ground in wiring between fuel additive level sensor terminal B and fuel additive control module terminal 13
•  Open circuit in wiring between fuel additive level sensor terminal C and fuel additive control module terminal 10
•  Short to power supply between fuel additive level sensor terminal C and fuel additive control module terminal 10
•  Short circuit in wiring between fuel additive level sensor terminal A and B
•  Short circuit in wiring between fuel additive level sensor terminal B and C
•  Fuel additive control module malfunction
•  PCM malfunction

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has the FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Verify related service repair information availability.
•  Is any related repair information available?
Yes
Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
IDENTIFY TRIGGER DTC FOR FREEZE FRAME DATA
•  Is P1922 on FREEZE FRAME DATA?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Go to troubleshooting procedures for DTC in FREEZE FRAME DATA.
4
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENSOR CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Turn the engine switch off.
•  Disconnect the fuel additive level sensor connector.
•  Inspect poor connection (such as damaged, pulled-out terminals, corrosion, etc.).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace terminal, then go to Step 14.
No
Go to the next step.
5
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENOR POWER SUPPLY CIRCUIT FOR OPEN
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Measure the voltage between fuel additive level sensor terminal A (harness-side) and body ground.
•  Is the voltage 4.5—5.5 V?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair for open circuit, then go to Step 14.
6
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENSOR GROUND CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Measure the voltage between fuel additive level sensor terminal A (harness-side) and body ground.
•  Is the voltage below 1.0 V?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair for short to power, then go to Step 14.
7
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE CONTROL MODULE CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Turn the engine switch off.
•  Disconnect fuel additive control module connector.
•  Inspect poor connection (such as damaged, pulled-out terminals, corrosion, etc.).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace terminal, then go to Step 14.
No
Go to the next step.
8
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENSOR SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Measure the voltage between fuel additive level sensor terminal B (harness-side) and body ground.
•  Is the voltage below 1.0 V?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace harness for short to power, then go to Step 14.
9
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENSOR SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO GROUND
•  Turn the engine switch off.
•  Inspect continuity between fuel additive level sensor terminal B (harness-side) and body ground.
•  Is there any continuity?
Yes
Repair or replace harness for short to ground, then go to Step 14.
No
Go to the next step.
10
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENSOR SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR OPEN
•  Inspect continuity connector between fuel additive level sensor terminal B (harness-side) and fuel additive control module terminal 13 (harness-side).
•  Is there any continuity?
Yes
Repair or replace harness for open, then go to Step 14.
No
Go to the next step.
11
INSPECT FUEL LEVEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENSOR SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER SUPPLY
•  Inspect continuity between fuel additive level sensor terminal A and B (harness-side).
•  Is there any continuity?
Yes
Repair or replace for short circuit, then go to Step 14.
No
Go to the next step.
12
INSPECT FUEL LEVEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENSOR SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO SENSOR GROUND
•  Inspect continuity between fuel additive level sensor terminal B and C (harness-side).
•  Is there any continuity?
Yes
Repair or replace for short circuit, then go to Step 14.
No
Go to the next step.
13
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE LEVEL SENSOR
•  Inspect the fuel additive level sensor.
•  Is the fuel additive level sensor normal?
Yes
Intermittent concern exits go to the next step.
No
Replace the fuel additive level sensor, then go to the next step.
14
VERIFY THAT DTC P1922 TROUBLESHOOTING IS COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
•  Start the engine and warm-up to normal operating temperature.
•  Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
•  Retrieve the DTC using the M-MDS.
•  Is the PENDING CODE same DTC present?
Yes
Replace fuel additive control module, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
15
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform "After Repair Procedure".
•  Is there any DTC present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
If the DTC P1922 presents replace the PCM.
No
Troubleshooting completed.